Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 2. State Game Sanctuaries.

Sec. 16.20.090.
Legislative findings; purpose of AS 16.20.090 — 16.20.098.

The legislature recognizes that

the Walrus Islands are the sole remaining place in the state where walruses annually haul out on land and all similar “hauling grounds” in the state which were formerly utilized have been abandoned by walruses due to excessive molestation and slaughter;

the Walrus Islands are uninhabited, and the walruses frequenting them are not required by the state for subsistence utilization;

the Walrus Islands have great importance as a retreat for the Pacific walrus from the standpoints of conservation, scientific value, and tourist interest;

the Department of Natural Resources has taken appropriate action to achieve transfer of title in the Walrus Islands to the state.

The purpose of AS

16.20.090

—

16.20.098

is to protect the walruses and other game on the Walrus Islands.

History.

(§ 1 ch 115 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was formerly AS

16.20.100

. Renumbered in 1992.

Sec. 16.20.092.
Walrus Islands State Game Sanctuary established.

The following land areas in Bristol Bay and adjacent state waters are established as a state game sanctuary to be known as the Walrus Islands State Game Sanctuary:

Round Island;

Crooked Island;

High Island;

Summit Island;

The Twins;

Black Rock.

History.

(§ 2 ch 115 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

16.20.110

. Renumbered in 1992.

Sec. 16.20.094.
Authority to administer.

The boards may adopt regulations governing entry, development, construction, hunting, fishing, and all other uses or activities not in conflict with AS

16.20.096

and

16.20.098

for the purpose of preserving the natural habitat and the fish and game of the Walrus Islands State Game Sanctuary.

History.

(§ 3 ch 115 SLA 1960; am § 26 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.20.120. Renumbered in 1992.

Administrative Code. —

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

For special areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 4.

For permit procedures, see 5 AAC 95, art. 7.

Sec. 16.20.096.
Multiple use.

Oil and mineral exploration and development is permitted on the Walrus Islands State Game Sanctuary in accordance with state or federal laws and regulations, subject to the limitations of AS

16.20.098

and to additional limitations jointly determined by the commissioner of natural resources and the commissioner of fish and game to assure compatible multiple land use practices.

History.

(§ 4 ch 115 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.20.130. Renumbered in 1992.

Administrative Code. —

For special areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 4.

For permit procedures, see 5 AAC 95, art. 7.

Sec. 16.20.098.
Sale prohibited; authorized leasing.

Land in the Walrus Islands State Game Sanctuary may not be sold.
It may be leased only as mineral land as authorized in regulations of the Department of Natural Resources.

History.

(§ 5 ch 115 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.20.140. Renumbered in 1992.

Sec. 16.20.100.
[Renumbered as AS 16.20.090(b).]

Secs. 16.20.110 — 16.20.140.
[Renumbered as AS 16.20.092 — 16.20.098.]

Sec. 16.20.150.
Stan Price State Wildlife Sanctuary.

The state-owned tide and submerged land and water within the following described parcels is established as a state wildlife sanctuary to be known as the Stan Price State Wildlife Sanctuary:

The Stan Price State Wildlife Sanctuary is established to provide permanent protection for brown bears, other fish and wildlife populations, and their habitats in the area so that these resources may be preserved for scientific, aesthetic, and educational purposes.

A board may adopt regulations governing access, entry, development, construction, and each other use and activity affecting the natural habitat and the fish and wildlife within the Stan Price State Wildlife Sanctuary.

Consistent with (b) of this section, the commissioner shall manage the Stan Price State Wildlife Sanctuary compatibly with the United States Forest Service’s management of the adjacent upland. The commissioner may enter into a cooperative management agreement with a federal agency, a municipality, another state agency, or a private landowner to achieve the purposes of this section.

Township 46 South, Range 69 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 5: W1/2, W1/2E1/2

Section 6: SE1/4SE1/4

Section 7:
NE1/4NE1/4

Section 8:
NW1/4, W1/2NE1/4, N1/2SW1/4.

History.

(§ 1 ch 112 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

Sec. 16.20.160.
McNeil River State Game Sanctuary.

The following state-owned land and water, including the tidelands but exclusive of marine water and submerged land, lying within the parcels described in this subsection is established as the McNeil River State Game sanctuary:

Township 12 South, Range 29 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 1 - 36

Township 12 South, Range 30 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 1 - 36

Township 13 South, Range 29 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 5 - 8

Sections 17 - 20

Sections 29 - 32

Township 13 South, Range 30 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 1 - 36

Township 13 South, Range 31 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 1 - 36

Township 13 South, Range 32 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 1 - 36

Township 14 South, Range 32 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 1 - 12

Sections 15 - 22

Sections 27 - 30.

History.

(§ 2 ch 108 SLA 1967; am § 15 ch 71 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 56 SLA 1991)

Delayed amendment. —

Under §§ 5 and 9,
ch. 56, SLA 1991, upon the entry of a final order permanently enjoining the operation of the Paint River fish ladder and the expiration of any time for appeal of the order, this section is amended to read: “Sec. 16.20.160. Sanctuary established. The following described area and adjacent state waters are established as a state game sanctuary to be known as the McNeil River State Game Sanctuary: Beginning at the NE corner of Section 13, T 12 S R 30 W, S.M., westerly along the section lines to the NW corner of Section 18, T 12 S R 30 W, S.M., thence southerly along the township boundary to the SW corner of T 12 S R 30 W, S.M., thence westerly along the north boundary of T 13 S R 31 W, S.M., to the NW corner of T 13 S R 31 W, S.M., thence westerly along the north boundary of T 13 S R 32 W, S.M., to the NW corner of T 13 S R 32 W, S.M., thence southerly along the west boundary of T 13 S R 32 W, S.M., to the SW corner of T 13 S R 32 W, S.M., thence southerly along the west boundary of T 14 S R 32 W, S.M., to the SW corner of Section 30, T 14 S R 32 W, S.M., thence easterly along the section lines to the SE corner of Section 27, T 14 S R 32 W, S.M., thence northerly along the section lines to the NE corner of Section 15, T 14 S R 32 W, S.M., thence easterly along the section lines to the east boundary of T 14 S R 32 W, S.M., thence northerly along the east boundary of T 14 S R 32 W, S.M., to the NE corner of T 14 S R 32 W, S.M., thence easterly along the south boundary of T 13 S R 31 W, S.M., to the SE corner of T 13 S R 31 W, S.M., thence northerly along the east boundary of T 13 S R 31 W, S.M., to the NE corner of Section 24, T 13 S R 31 W, S.M., thence easterly along the section lines to the SE corner of Section 16, T 13 S R 30 W, S.M., thence northerly along the section lines to the NE corner of Section 4, T 13 S R 30 W, S.M., thence easterly along the south boundary of T 12 S R 30 W, S.M., to the SE corner of T 12 S R 30 W, S.M., thence easterly along the south boundary of T 12 S R 29 W, S.M., to the shoreline of Horseshoe Cove located in Section 32, T 12 S R 29 W, S.M., thence northerly, westerly, and northerly along the line of mean high tide to the point of beginning.” The commissioner of fish and game shall certify to the revisor of statutes the date determined under § 9,
ch. 56, SLA 1991. As of May 2022, the required certification had not occurred.

Administrative Code. —

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

For restricted areas, see 5 AAC 92, art. 12.

For state game refuges, see 5 AAC 95, art. 5.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 1, ch. 108, SLA 1967, provides: “PURPOSE. The legislature intends in this Act to provide for the permanent protection of brown bear and other wildlife population and their vital habitat in the area of the McNeil River so that these resources may be preserved for scientific, esthetic and educational purposes.”

Under § 8, ch. 56, SLA 1991, the amendment to this section by § 3, ch. 56, SLA 1991 was to become effective on the date the Paint River fish ladder began operation. The commissioner of fish and game certified that the fish ladder began operation on January 1, 1993. The section is set out above as amended by § 3, ch. 56, SLA 1991.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 71, SLA 1972 (HCSSB 383 am H), see 1972 House Journal, p. 898.

Sec. 16.20.162.
Purpose; regulations.

The McNeil River State Game Sanctuary is established to

provide permanent protection for brown bear and other fish and wildlife populations and their habitats, so that these resources may be preserved for scientific, aesthetic, and educational purposes;

manage human use and activities in a way that is compatible with (1) of this subsection and to maintain and enhance the unique bear viewing opportunities within the sanctuary; and

provide opportunities that are compatible with (1) of this subsection for wildlife viewing, fisheries enhancement, and fishing, for temporary safe anchorage, and for other activities.

Hunting and trapping within the McNeil River State Game Sanctuary are prohibited.

The department and the Department of Natural Resources

may not enter into sales of land within the McNeil River State Game Sanctuary;

may enter into leases within the McNeil River State Game Sanctuary if the commissioner finds that activity conducted under the lease is compatible with the purposes for which the sanctuary is established;

may not accept transfer of state selected land from the federal government, or conveyance of other land, within the sanctuary if the land is subject to

a lease, easement, or other right to operate or maintain a private facility on the land or to conduct a private enterprise on the land; or

a continuing trespass by an unauthorized private facility or private enterprise.

The McNeil River State Game Sanctuary is closed to mineral entry under AS

38.05.185

—

38.05.275

.

The boards may adopt regulations governing access, entry, development, construction, fishing, and other uses and activities affecting the natural habitat, fish and wildlife, and public use of the McNeil River State Game Sanctuary.

The commissioner shall prepare a report and notify the legislature of its availability by January 30 of each year on

the status of the brown bears and other fish and wildlife resources within the McNeil River State Game Sanctuary; and

the effects of fishing and fishery enhancement activity on these resources.

History.

(§ 2 ch 108 SLA 1967; am § 4 ch 56 SLA 1991; am § 22 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 3 ch 59 SLA 1999)

Delayed amendment. —

Under §§ 6 and 9,
ch. 56, SLA 1991, upon entry of a final order permanently enjoining the operation of the Paint River fish ladder and the expiration of any time for appeal of the order, this section is amended to read: “Sec.

16.20.162

. Applicability of other laws. The provisions of
AS 16.20.120 —
16.20.140 relating to administration, multiple use and sale and lease of the Walrus Islands State Game Sanctuary apply also with respect to the McNeil River State Game Sanctuary.” The commissioner of fish and game shall certify to the revisor of statutes the date determined under § 9,
ch. 56, SLA 1991. As of May 2022, the required certification had not occurred.

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

16.20.170

. Renumbered in 1992.

Administrative Code. —

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

For restricted areas, see 5 AAC 92, art. 12.

For special areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 4.

For state game refuges, see 5 AAC 95, art. 5.

For permit procedures, see 5 AAC 95, art. 7.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 8, ch 56, SLA 1991, the amendment to this section by § 4, ch. 56, SLA 1991 was to become effective on the date the Paint River fish ladder began operation. The commissioner of fish and game certified that the fish ladder began operation on January 1, 1993. The section is set out above as amended by § 4, ch. 56, SLA 1991.

Sec. 16.20.170.
[Renumbered as AS 16.20.162.]